Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.020

Legislative declaration of family unit as resource to be nurtured—Rights of child.

The legislature declares that the family unit is a fundamental resource of American life which should be nurtured. Toward the continuance of this principle, the legislature declares that the family unit should remain intact unless a child's right to conditions of basic nurture, health, or safety is jeopardized. When the rights of basic nurture, physical and mental health, and safety of the child and the legal rights of the parents are in conflict, the rights and safety of the child should prevail. In making reasonable efforts under this chapter, the child's health and safety shall be the paramount concern. The right of a child to basic nurturing includes the right to a safe, stable, and permanent home and a speedy resolution of any proceeding under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 314 s 1; 1990 c 284 s 31; 1987 c 524 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 30.]

NOTES:

Finding—Effective date—1990 c 284: See notes following RCW 74.13.250.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.